Illinois, session 104th, HB4087.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Regional Generation Reliability Task Force Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly hereby finds, 7determines, and declares the following:8        (1) The reliability of the Illinois electricity grid 9    is critically important to the consumers, businesses, and 10    all residents of Illinois and should not be compromised.11        (2) Illinois has taken definitive steps toward 12    redefining the generation mix in Illinois.13        (3) The Midcontinent Independent System Operator, Inc. 14    ("MISO") is an independent, not-for-profit, member-based 15    organization responsible for operating the power grid 16    across 15 states and the Canadian province of Manitoba, 17    serving 42 million people.18        (4) The PJM Interconnection LLC ("PJM"), is an 19    independent not-for-profit, member-based Regional 20    Transmission Organization ("RTO") that manages the 21    operations, supply, and movement of power across 13 states 22    and the District of Columbia, serving 65 million people.23        (5) Illinois is served by both PJM and MISO, which   HB4087- 2 -LRB104 14512 AAS 27652 b1    collectively ensure that sufficient electric power 2    generation supply and transmission are available to meet 3    electric demand every minute of every day for over 4    107,000,000 people across 28 states and 2 countries. 5    Wholesale electric power generation is regulated by the 6    Federal Energy Regulatory Commission due to the interstate 7    and international nature of the transmission grid operated 8    by PJM and MISO. As such, Illinois policy changes at the 9    State level can affect the reliability, availability, and 10    cost of power for seniors, families, businesses, 11    municipalities, universities, and hospitals across the 12    region.13        (6) When natural disasters occur, such as ice storms, 14    blizzards, tornadoes, and hurricanes, states participating 15    in PJM and MISO have provided support to each other 16    through power generation restoration missions. The 17    inability to deliver power generation in critical times 18    can have a huge economic impact and can also result in 19    death across the PJM and MISO Regional Transmission 20    Organizations.21        (7) PJM and MISO have multiple markets in which power 22    suppliers participate. The Capacity Market, Day-Ahead 23    Energy Market, and Frequency Market are markets that power 24    generators participate in to ensure over 107,000,000 25    people across 28 states and 2 countries receive the right 26    amount of electricity every minute of every day.  HB4087- 3 -LRB104 14512 AAS 27652 b1            (A) Capacity markets are used in wholesale 2        electricity markets to pay resources for being 3        available to meet peak electricity demand. Capacity is 4        not actual electricity, but rather the ability to 5        produce electricity when called upon. Capacity is 6        procured, sometimes multiple years in advance of when 7        it is needed, based on projections of future energy 8        needs using historical demand requirements.9            (B) The Day-Ahead Energy Market lets market 10        participants commit to buy or sell wholesale 11        electricity one day before the power is needed, to 12        help avoid price volatility. The Real-Time Energy 13        Market balances the differences between day-ahead 14        commitments and the actual real-time demand for and 15        production of electricity.16            (C) The power grid operates, and shall be 17        maintained, at a constant frequency of 60 hertz. 18        Significant deviation from this level can result in 19        catastrophic damage to the power grid as well as 20        household appliances. Frequency is maintained when 21        electric generators automatically add or remove power 22        from the grid. For example, a large power plant 23        suddenly tripping offline reduces the total amount of 24        available kinetic energy, leading the rotating 25        generators on the system to start rotating less 26        rapidly and thereby decreasing the alternating current   HB4087- 4 -LRB104 14512 AAS 27652 b1        frequency across the grid system. Since a generator 2        turbine's rotational velocity is directly coupled to 3        the grid frequency, the generator's control systems 4        can sense this frequency decline as an indicator of 5        insufficient energy provision. The control system 6        within each power plant, which usually has been in the 7        form of a governor, can then automatically increase 8        the plant's power output. This process is autonomous 9        because the governor does not have to wait for a 10        central dispatcher to send a signal, thus bypassing 11        communications system delays.12        (8) The shifting generation mix in PJM and MISO will 13    require optimum performance and an increased focus on the 14    need to retain reliability as certain existing generators 15    shut down operations and new, intermittent generators are 16    added. Additionally, increased power generation 17    consumption due to increased electric vehicles and 18    charging stations, along with increased electrification of 19    building heating needs, will undoubtedly place greater 20    demand on the power system.21        (9) Illinois has a responsibility to ensure the 22    performance of Illinois and Regional Power Grids are safe, 23    reliable, and maintain the necessary capacity to meet the 24    power demands of Illinois residents. Additionally, 25    Illinois has an obligation to do its part to ensure the 26    regional power grid is safe and reliable for its   HB4087- 5 -LRB104 14512 AAS 27652 b1    partnering states. As part of the regional power grid, 2    Illinois should be concerned that shuttered facilities in 3    Illinois will be replaced by higher cost, higher emissions 4    resources from other states. 5    Section 10. Illinois Regional Generation Reliability Task 6Force.7    (a) The Illinois Regional Generation Reliability Task 8Force is created. The Task Force shall monitor the reliability 9of the Illinois power grid. The Task Force should consider the 10present and future needs of Illinois consumers while 11simultaneously addressing any issues related to the 12performance and reliability of power generation and 13transmission and being mindful of the ultimate cost to 14consumers.15    (b) The duties and responsibilities of the Task Force 16include the following:17        (1) Identifying and assessing policies, rules, and 18    laws that have the potential to significantly affect the 19    reliability of the Illinois and regional power grids.20        (2) Developing a set of standards and conditions that 21    will ensure optimal performance of the Illinois and 22    regional power grids based on new and emerging 23    technologies.24        (3) Identifying opportunities to improve the Illinois 25    power supply mix through existing and new laws to ensure   HB4087- 6 -LRB104 14512 AAS 27652 b1    continued power reliability at affordable rates for 2    Illinois consumers.3        (4) Compiling research and best practices from other 4    states and countries on how to deploy technology to 5    benefit the performance and reliability of the power grid.6        (5) Developing tools to assess the impact of proposed 7    policies and evaluate their costs and benefits on 8    families, employers, the public, Illinois, and other 9    states as part of the Illinois and regional power grids.10        (6) Identifying data, reports, and relevant 11    information on the performance of the power grid to ensure 12    reliability and that pricing of power generation is in the 13    best interest of families, businesses, and communities in 14    Illinois.15        (7) Providing its findings and recommendations for 16    policy changes and any revisions to policies, rules, and 17    laws that will facilitate the stability and reliability of 18    the Illinois and regional power grids on an annual basis 19    to the General Assembly.20        (8) Developing and proposing legislative concepts to 21    ensure the future stability and reliability of the power 22    grid. 23    Section 15. Membership; meetings. 24    (a) The members of the Illinois Regional Generation 25Reliability Task Force shall be composed of the following:  HB4087- 7 -LRB104 14512 AAS 27652 b1        (1) three Senators appointed by the President of the 2    Senate, one of whom shall be designated by the President 3    as the co-chair of the Task Force; 4        (2) three Representatives appointed by the Speaker of 5    the House of Representatives, one of whom shall be 6    designated by the Speaker as the co-chair of the Task 7    Force; 8        (3) three Senators appointed by the Minority Leader of 9    the Senate; 10        (4) three Representatives appointed by the Minority 11    Leader of the House of Representatives; 12        (5) one member appointed by the Governor whose sole 13    role is dedicated to energy policy for the State; 14        (6) one member of a State or local labor organization 15    appointed by the President of the Senate; 16        (7) one member of a State or local labor organization 17    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; 18        (8) one representative from PJM RTO designated by PJM; 19        (9) one representative from the PJM Independent Market 20    Monitor organization designated by the PJM Independent 21    Market Monitor organization; 22        (10) one representative from MISO RTO designated by 23    MISO; 24        (11) one representative from the MISO Independent 25    Market Monitor organization designated by the MISO 26    Independent Market Monitor organization;   HB4087- 8 -LRB104 14512 AAS 27652 b1        (12) six representatives from 6 different power 2    generation companies that operate in the PJM or MISO 3    regional transmission organization, 2 appointed by the 4    President of the Senate, 2 appointed by the Speaker of the 5    House of Representatives, one appointed by the Minority 6    Leader in the Senate, and one appointed by the Minority 7    Leader in the House of Representatives; 8        (13) one representative from a statewide organization 9    representing retail merchants appointed by the President 10    of the Senate; 11        (14) one representative from a statewide organization 12    representing manufacturers appointed by the Speaker of the 13    House of Representatives; 14        (15) one representative from a statewide organization 15    representing retired people appointed by the Speaker of 16    the House of Representatives; 17        (16) one representative from a minority-owned 18    geothermal group appointed by the President of the Senate; 19        (17) one representative from a statewide organization 20    representing business appointed by the Speaker of the 21    House of Representatives; 22        (18) two representatives from environmental law 23    groups, one appointed by the President of the Senate and 24    one appointed by the Speaker of the House of 25    Representatives; 26        (19) the Director of the Illinois Power Agency, or the   HB4087- 9 -LRB104 14512 AAS 27652 b1    Director's designee; 2        (20) the Director of the Environmental Protection 3    Agency, or the Director's designee; and 4        (21) the Chair of the Illinois Commerce Commission, or 5    the Chair's designee. 6    (b) Appointments for the Task Force shall be made by 7November 1, 2026. The Task Force shall hold 7 meetings 8annually, either remotely or in person, and the first meeting 9shall be held within 30 days after appointments are made.10    (c) Members of the Task Force shall serve without 11compensation.12    (d) The Illinois Commerce Commission shall provide 13administrative support to the Task Force in conjunction with 14the Independent Market Monitors for the MISO and PJM Regional 15Transmission Organizations. 16    Section 20. Annual report.17    (a) The Illinois Regional Generation Reliability Task 18Force shall issue an annual report based upon its findings in 19the course of performing its duties and responsibilities. The 20report shall be written by the administrative staff of the 21Task Force and with staff assistance from the Independent 22Market Monitors from the MISO and PJM Regional Transmission 23Organizations.24    (b) The Illinois Regional Generation Reliability Task 25Force shall submit its first report on April 1, 2027, and each   HB4087- 10 -LRB104 14512 AAS 27652 b1April 1 thereafter to the General Assembly upon the completion 2of its meeting schedule and shall continue to issue annual 3reports each year. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.